Connecticut, session 2026, HB05514.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 19a-490 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) "Institution" means a hospital, short-term hospital special hospice,
hospice inpatient facility, residential care home, nursing home facility,
home health care agency, home health aide agency, behavioral health
facility, assisted living services agency, substance abuse treatment
facility, outpatient surgical facility, outpatient clinic, clinical laboratory,
blood collection facility, source plasma donation center, birth center, an
infirmary operated by an educational institution for the care of students
enrolled in [, and] such institution, faculty and employees of [,] such
institution, and the dependent family members of such students, faculty
and employees, which family members are enrolled in such institution's
health plan; a facility engaged in providing services for the prevention,
diagnosis, treatment or care of human health conditions, including
facilities operated and maintained by any state agency; and a residential
facility for persons with intellectual disability licensed pursuant to
section 17a-227 and certified to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
program as an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual
disability. "Institution" does not include any facility for the care and
treatment of persons with mental illness or substance use disorder
operated or maintained by any state agency, except Whiting Forensic
Hospital and the hospital and psychiatric residential treatment facility
units of the Albert J. Solnit Children's Center;
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Assisted living services" has the same meaning as provided in
section 19a-693 of the general statutes;
(2) "Assisted living services agency" has the same meaning as
provided in section 19a-693 of the general statutes;
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health, or the
commissioner's designee;
(4) "Department" means the Department of Public Health; and
(5) "Managed residential community" has the same meaning as
provided in section 19a-693 of the general statutes.
(b) The Commissioner of Public Health shall establish a working
group to advise the Department of Public Health regarding (1) managed
residential communities in the state where assisted living services
agencies provide assisted living services to the residents of such
communities, and (2) whether licensure of such communities by the
department would enable the department and such communities to
improve the health, safety and overall well-being of such residents. The
working group shall include, but need not be limited to, not less than
three representatives of different managed residential communities in
the state, not less than three representatives of different assisted living
services agencies in the state, not less than three residents who are
receiving assisted living services in a managed residential community
Public Act No. 26-13 2 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
in the state, one each from a different managed residential community,
not less than three relatives of residents who are receiving such services
from a managed residential community, one each from a different
managed residential community, and a representative of an association
of aging services organizations in the state. Not later than January 1,
2027, the working group shall report to the commissioner regarding its
findings and recommendations.
(c) Not later than February 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Public
Health shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public health on the
findings and recommendations of the working group and, for each
finding and recommendation, whether the Department of Public Health
is in agreement with such finding and recommendation.
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions
of chapter 381 of the general statutes, a nonprofit organization that
delivers optical glasses produced by an optician licensed under said
chapter to the ultimate wearer of such glasses at no cost to such wearer
may deliver such glasses to an authorized representative of such wearer
if such wearer is unavailable to receive the glasses in person from such
organization.
Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027,
each health care provider shall notify each patient, in writing, at the time
of the initial intake of such patient (1) of the laws concerning the length
of time that the provider is required to maintain patient medical records,
and (2) of the manner in which the patient may request copies of the
patient's medical records from the provider.
Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 17b-338 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
Public Act No. 26-13 3 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(a) There is established a Long-Term Care Advisory Council which
shall consist of the following: (1) The executive director of the
Commission on Women, Children, Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, or
the executive director's designee; (2) the State Nursing Home
Ombudsman, or the ombudsman's designee; (3) the president of the
Coalition of Presidents of Resident Councils, or the president's designee;
(4) the executive director of the Legal Assistance Resource Center of
Connecticut, or the executive director's designee; (5) the state president
of AARP, or the president's designee; (6) one representative of a
bargaining unit for health care employees, appointed by the president
of the bargaining unit; (7) the president of LeadingAge Connecticut and
Rhode Island, Inc., or the president's designee; (8) the president of the
Connecticut Association of Health Care Facilities, or the president's
designee; (9) the president of the Connecticut Association of Residential
Care Homes, or the president's designee; (10) the president of the
Connecticut Hospital Association or the president's designee; (11) the
executive director of the Connecticut Assisted Living Association or the
executive director's designee; (12) the executive director of the
Connecticut Association for Homecare or the executive director's
designee; (13) the president of Connecticut Community Care, Inc. or the
president's designee; (14) one member of the Connecticut Association of
Area Agencies on Aging appointed by the agency; (15) the president of
the Connecticut chapter of the Connecticut Alzheimer's Association;
(16) one member of the Connecticut Association of Adult Day Centers
appointed by the association; (17) the president of the Connecticut
Chapter of the American College of Health Care Administrators, or the
president's designee; (18) the president of the Connecticut Council for
Persons with Disabilities, or the president's designee; (19) the president
of the Connecticut Association of Community Action Agencies, or the
president's designee; (20) a personal care attendant appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives; (21) a person who, in a home
setting, cares for a person with a disability and is appointed by the
president pro tempore of the Senate; (22) three persons with a disability
Public Act No. 26-13 4 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
appointed one each by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, the majority leader of the Senate and the minority
leader of the House of Representatives; (23) a legislator who is a member
of the Long-Term Care Planning Committee; (24) one member who is a
nonunion home health aide appointed by the minority leader of the
Senate; and (25) the executive director of the nonprofit entity designated
by the Governor in accordance with section 46a-10b to serve as the
Connecticut protection and advocacy system or the executive director's
designee.
Sec. 6. Subsection (d) of section 19a-127l of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) The advisory committee shall consist of (1) four members who
represent and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Hospital
Association, including three members who represent three separate
hospitals that are not affiliated of which one such hospital is an
academic medical center; (2) one member who represents and shall be
appointed by the Connecticut Nursing Association; (3) two members
who represent and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Medical
Society, including one member who is an active medical care provider;
(4) two members who represent and shall be appointed by the
Connecticut Business and Industry Association, including one member
who represents a large business and one member who represents a
small business; (5) one member who represents and shall be appointed
by the Home Health Care Association; (6) one member who represents
and shall be appointed by the Connecticut Association of Health Care
Facilities; (7) one member who represents and shall be appointed by
LeadingAge Connecticut and Rhode Island, Inc.; (8) two members who
represent and shall be appointed by the AFL-CIO; (9) one member who
represents consumers of health care services and who shall be
appointed by the Commissioner of Public Health; (10) one member who
Public Act No. 26-13 5 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
represents a school of public health and who shall be appointed by the
Commissioner of Public Health; (11) the Commissioner of Public Health
or said commissioner's designee; (12) the Commissioner of Social
Services or said commissioner's designee; (13) the Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management or said secretary's designee; (14) two
members who represent licensed health plans and shall be appointed by
the Connecticut Association of Health Care Plans; (15) one member who
represents and shall be appointed by the federally designated state peer
review organization; and (16) one member who represents and shall be
appointed by the Connecticut Pharmaceutical Association. The
chairperson of the advisory committee shall be the Commissioner of
Public Health or said commissioner's designee. The chairperson of the
committee, with a vote of the majority of the members present, may
appoint ex-officio nonvoting members in specialties not represented
among voting members. Vacancies shall be filled by the person who
makes the appointment under this subsection.
Sec. 7. Subsection (b) of section 19a-515 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) Each licensee shall complete a minimum of forty hours of
continuing education every two years, including, but not limited to,
training in (1) Alzheimer's disease and dementia symptoms and care,
and (2) infection prevention and control. Such two-year period shall
commence on the first date of renewal of the licensee's license after
January 1, 2004. The continuing education shall be in areas related to the
licensee's practice. Qualifying continuing education activities are
courses offered or approved by the Connecticut Association of
Healthcare Facilities, LeadingAge Connecticut and Rhode Island, Inc.,
the Connecticut Assisted Living Association, the Connecticut Alliance
for Subacute Care, Inc., the Connecticut Chapter of the American
College of Health Care Administrators, the Association For Long Term
Public Act No. 26-13 6 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Care Financial Managers, the Alzheimer's Association or any accredited
college or university, or programs presented or approved by the
National Continuing Education Review Service of the National
Association of Boards of Examiners of Long Term Care Administrators,
the Association for Professionals in Infection Control and Epidemiology
or by federal or state departments or agencies.
Sec. 8. Subsection (g) of section 22a-430 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(g) (1) The commissioner shall, by regulation adopted prior to
October 1, 1977, establish and define categories of discharges that
constitute household and small commercial subsurface sewage disposal
systems for which the commissioner shall delegate to the Commissioner
of Public Health the authority to issue permits or approvals and to hold
public hearings in accordance with this section, on and after said date.
Not later than July 1, 2026, but only after the working group has
convened pursuant to section 49 of public act 25-97 and consideration of
the recommendations provided by such working group pursuant to said
section, the commissioner shall post a notice of intent to amend such
regulations on the eRegulations System to establish and define
categories of discharges that constitute small community sewerage
systems and household and small commercial subsurface sewage
disposal systems. The Commissioner of Public Health shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to establish
minimum requirements for small community sewerage systems and
household and small commercial subsurface sewage disposal systems
and procedures for the issuance of such permits or approvals by the
local director of health or an environmental health specialist registered
pursuant to chapter 395. The commissioner shall issue and update
technical standards applicable to the design, installation, engineering
and operation of on-site sewage disposal systems under the jurisdiction
Public Act No. 26-13 7 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
of the Department of Public Health. Such technical standards shall not
be considered regulations of Connecticut state agencies, as defined in
section 4-166. The commissioner may implement policies and
procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection
while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as
regulations, provided notice of intent to adopt regulations is published
on the eRegulations System not later than twenty days after the date of
implementation of such policies and procedures. Policies and
procedures implemented pursuant to this subsection shall be valid until
the time final regulations are adopted in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 54. As used in this subsection, small community sewerage
systems and household and small commercial disposal systems shall
include those subsurface sewage disposal systems with a capacity of ten
thousand gallons per day or less. Notwithstanding any provision of the
general statutes (1) the regulations adopted by the commissioner
pursuant to this subsection that are in effect as of July 1, 2017, shall apply
to household and small commercial subsurface sewage disposal
systems with a capacity of seven thousand five hundred gallons per day
or less, and (2) the regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant
to this subsection that are in effect on or after July 1, 2026, shall apply to
small community sewerage systems, household systems and small
commercial subsurface sewerage disposal systems with a capacity of ten
thousand gallons per day or less. Any permit denied by the
Commissioner of Public Health, or a director of health or registered
environmental health specialist shall be subject to hearing and appeal in
the manner provided in section 19a-229. Any permit granted by the
Commissioner of Public Health, or a director of health or registered
environmental health specialist on or after October 1, 1977, shall be
deemed equivalent to a permit issued under subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) As used in this subdivision, "nitrogen removal technology" means
a system designed to remove nitrogen for use in subsurface sewage
Public Act No. 26-13 8 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
disposal systems delegated to the Commissioner of Public Health
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, except systems regulated
pursuant to section 19a-35a. Not later than July 1, 2028, the
Commissioners of Public Health and Energy and Environmental
Protection shall consult with stakeholders with expertise in nitrogen
removal to:
(A) Determine nitrogen credit equal to the nitrogen credit values for
nitrogen removal technologies approved by the Department of Energy
and Environmental Protection and published in the technical standards
established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to July 1,
2028;
(B) Determine nitrogen credit equal to the nitrogen credit values for
nitrogen removal technologies approved by the Department of Energy
and Environmental Protection that have not been published prior to July
1, 2028, in the technical standards established pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection, for nitrogen removal technologies that meet the
definition of subsurface sewage disposal systems as established in
regulation pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
(C) Establish procedures and standards for the review and approval
of new nitrogen removal technologies, which procedures and standards
shall be supported by independent third‑party testing and climate-
relevant field data demonstrating the effectiveness of the technology in
removing nitrogen. The Commissioner of Public Health shall (i) adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
implement the provisions of this subparagraph, and (ii) publish
specifications for nitrogen removal technologies approved in
accordance with such procedures and standards in the technical
standards established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Sec. 9. Section 20-200 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-13 9 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-198, the
Department of Public Health may issue a license by endorsement to any
veterinarian of good professional character who is currently licensed
and practicing in some other state or territory, having requirements for
admission determined by the department to be at least equal to the
requirements of this state, upon the payment of a fee of five hundred
sixty-five dollars to said department. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 20-198, the department may, upon payment of a fee of five
hundred sixty-five dollars, issue a license without examination to a
currently practicing, competent veterinarian in another state or territory
who [(1)] (A) holds a current valid license in good professional standing
issued after examination by another state or territory that maintains
licensing standards which, except for examination, are commensurate
with this state's standards, and [(2)] (B) has worked continuously as a
licensed veterinarian in an academic or clinical setting in another state
or territory for a period of not less than five years immediately
preceding the application for licensure without examination. No license
shall be issued under this section to any applicant against whom
professional disciplinary action is pending or who is the subject of an
unresolved complaint. The department shall inform the board annually
of the number of applications it receives for licensure under this section.
[(b)] (2) The Department of Public Health may issue a temporary
permit under this subsection to an applicant for licensure without
examination upon receipt of a completed application form,
accompanied by the fee for licensure without examination, a copy of a
current license from another state of the United States, the District of
Columbia or a commonwealth or territory subject to the laws of the
United States, and a notarized affidavit attesting that the license is valid
and belongs to the person requesting notarization. Such temporary
permit shall be valid for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty
calendar days and shall not be renewable. The department shall not
issue a temporary permit under this section to any applicant against
Public Act No. 26-13 10 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
whom professional disciplinary action is pending, or who is the subject
of an unresolved complaint.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 20-198, the Department
of Public Health may issue a temporary permit to an applicant who (1)
is a graduate from a school located outside of the United States, its
territories or Canada with a degree of doctor of veterinary medicine, or
its equivalent, from a program acceptable to the American Veterinary
Medical Association as required to receive certification by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates, and (2) is
working toward receiving certification from the Educational
Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates or Program for the
Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence. Such temporary
permit shall authorize the holder to practice veterinary medicine only
under the direct supervision of a veterinarian who has been licensed
under chapter 384 for not less than two years. Such temporary permit
shall be valid for a period not to exceed two years after the date of
issuance, except such temporary permit shall be renewable once for a
period of two years if the applicant fails to receive certification from the
Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary Graduates or Program
for the Assessment of Veterinary Education Equivalence within the first
two-year period. No fee shall be required for the issuance or renewal of
a temporary permit under this section. As used in this subsection,
"direct supervision" means the licensed veterinarian is present in the
office where the temporary permit holder is performing such holder's
duties and immediately available to furnish assistance and direction to
such holder throughout the performance of such duties.
Sec. 10. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a veterinary
telemedicine working group. The working group shall (1) evaluate the
feasibility of permitting the establishment of a veterinarian-client-
patient relationship through veterinary telemedicine in the state when
an animal is in need of medical care or treatment, and (2) if the working
Public Act No. 26-13 11 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
group determines that permitting such establishment is feasible, make
recommendations regarding the parameters of such relationship. The
working group shall be within the Legislative Department.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, or their designees;
(2) One appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, who shall be a member of an association of
veterinarians in the state;
(3) One appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, who shall be a proponent of the establishment
of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship through veterinary
telemedicine when an animal is in need of medical care or treatment;
(4) One appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, who shall be a proponent of the establishment
of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship through veterinary
telemedicine when an animal is in need of medical care or treatment;
and
(5) One appointed by the House ranking member of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, who shall be a member of an association of
veterinarians in the state.
(c) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
Public Act No. 26-13 12 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
health shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(d) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
regarding its evaluation and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health.
Sec. 11. Section 19a-127k of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (j) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
(NEW) (j) When conducting a community health needs assessment,
each hospital shall, if warranted by data available to the hospital,
consider including the nutritional needs of community members with
diabetes and congestive heart failure and, to the extent permissible
under federal law, include such nutritional needs in the hospital's
community health needs assessment.
Sec. 12. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Bridging prescription" means a temporary, short-term
prescription issued to ensure continuity of medication while a patient
awaits specialized care;
(2) "Buprenorphine" means a synthetic opiate with partial agonist
actions approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration or any
successor agency for the treatment of opioid use disorder;
(3) "Community provider" means a health care provider permitted by
state and federal law to prescribe buprenorphine for the treatment of
opioid use disorder;
(4) "Last-dose letter" means a formal, sealed document provided by a
hospital to a patient that confirms the exact date, time and amount of
the last dose of methadone administered to the patient;
Public Act No. 26-13 13 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(5) "Methadone" means a long-acting synthetic opioid agonist
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration or any
successor agency for the treatment of opioid use disorder;
(6) "Opioid antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any other
similarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration or any successor agency for the treatment of a
drug overdose;
(7) "Opioid use disorder" has the same meaning as provided in the
most recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders; and
(8) "Opioid treatment program" means a certified opioid treatment
program, as described in 42 CFR 8, as amended from time to time, that
is permitted by state and federal law to administer methadone for the
treatment of opioid use disorder.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, each hospital licensed pursuant to
chapter 368v of the general statutes (1) may, to the extent permitted
under federal law, (A) administer buprenorphine or methadone to each
patient presenting to the hospital's emergency department with
symptoms of opioid use disorder without requiring the admission of the
patient to the hospital for the sole purpose of such administration,
provided (i) the administration of buprenorphine or methadone is
clinically indicated, and (ii) the patient consents to such administration,
(B) offer the patient a prescription for or a supply of an opioid antagonist
at the time of such patient's discharge from the emergency department
and, if the patient accepts the offer, provide the patient with such
prescription or dispense an opioid antagonist to the patient, and (C)
refer the patient to one or more community providers or opioid
treatment programs that can provide continuity in the prescription of
buprenorphine or administration of methadone, as applicable, and (2)
may, if clinically indicated, dispense a supply of methadone to each
Public Act No. 26-13 14 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
such patient in accordance with the provisions of section 21 CFR 1306.
If a hospital administers buprenorphine to a patient under this
subsection, the hospital shall provide the patient, to the extent permitted
by federal law, with a bridging prescription for buprenorphine for the
anticipated time period during which the patient will be awaiting
treatment from the community provider to which the hospital refers the
patient. If a hospital administers or dispenses methadone to a patient
under this subsection, the hospital shall provide the patient with a last-
dose letter to provide to the local opioid treatment program to which
the hospital refers the patient.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) require the
provision of any medication when clinically contraindicated, (2) limit
the exercise of professional judgment by a treating clinician, or (3)
preclude the use of any medication other than buprenorphine or
methadone for opioid use disorder when such medication is clinically
indicated and the patient consents to the administration of such
medication.
Sec. 13. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
working group regarding endometriosis for the purpose of evaluating
and making recommendations regarding the diagnosis, treatment,
research, education and public awareness of endometriosis in the state.
The working group shall be within the Legislative Department. The
working group shall evaluate the following:
(1) The prevalence and impact of endometriosis on residents of the
state;
(2) Barriers to timely and accurate diagnosis of endometriosis;
(3) Access to evidence-based treatment for endometriosis, including,
but not limited to, medical, surgical and therapeutic interventions;
(4) Insurance coverage and reimbursement practices for the
Public Act No. 26-13 15 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
treatment of endometriosis;
(5) The impact of endometriosis in the workplace, including, but not
limited to, leave, accommodations and employment protections;
(6) Gaps in public and provider education and training concerning
endometriosis; and
(7) Opportunities to improve endometriosis data collection, research
initiatives and patient outcomes.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members, who
shall be appointed not later than thirty days after the effective date of
this section:
(1) Four appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
(A) one of whom shall be a member of the House or Representatives, (B)
one of whom shall be a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the
general statutes with demonstrated experience in the diagnosis and
treatment of endometriosis, (C) one of whom shall be a representative
of a federally qualified health center, and (D) one of whom shall be an
individual residing in the state who has been diagnosed with
endometriosis;
(2) Four appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, (A)
one of whom shall be a member of the Senate, (B) one of whom shall be
a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general statutes who
is a member of the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, (C) one of whom shall be a researcher affiliated with an
academic or research institution in the state with expertise in
endometriosis, and (D) one of whom shall be a patient advocate with
experience advocating on behalf of individuals with endometriosis;
(3) Four appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, (A) one of whom shall be a member of the House of
Public Act No. 26-13 16 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Representatives, (B) one of whom shall be a pediatric or an adolescent
medicine physician licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general
statutes and currently practicing in the state, (C) one of whom shall be
an individual in the state with expertise in racial and health equity or
who represents a community-based organization serving historically
underserved populations, and (D) one of whom shall be a representative
of an association of hospitals in the state or an administrator of a hospital
in the state;
(4) Four appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, (A) one of
whom shall be a member of the Senate, (B) one of whom shall be a
representative of a school-based health center in the state, (C) one of
whom shall be a representative of a therapeutic or pharmaceutical
manufacturer with experience in treatments related to endometriosis,
and (D) one of whom shall be an individual residing in the state who
has been diagnosed with endometriosis;
(5) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
(6) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
and
(7) The cochairpersons of the endometriosis data and biorepository
program established pursuant to section 10a-132f of the general statutes.
(c) Except for members of the General Assembly, members who
represent state agencies and the cochairpersons of the endometriosis
data and biorepository program, six of the members first appointed
shall serve for a term of two years, six of such members shall serve for a
term of three years and, thereafter, members shall serve for a term of
two years. The executive director of the Commission on Women,
Children, Seniors, Equity and Opportunity shall determine which of the
members first appointed shall serve for a term of two years and which
Public Act No. 26-13 17 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
of such members shall serve for a term of three years. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority not later than thirty calendar days
after the appointment becomes vacant. Any member previously
appointed to the working group may be reappointed. The members of
the working group shall receive no compensation for their services but
may be reimbursed for any necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
(d) The administrative staff of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity shall serve as administrative staff of
the working group. The executive director of said commission shall
schedule the first meeting of the working group which shall be held not
later than sixty days after the effective date of this section. The working
group shall appoint a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its
members at its first meeting. The working group shall meet not less than
quarterly and provide an opportunity for public comment at its
meetings.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
working group shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to human services and public health regarding its evaluation
and recommendations, including, but not limited to, for legislation
necessary to implement any of such recommendations.
Sec. 14. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
advisory council on chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy and other
gene therapies. The council shall advise and make recommendations to
the Department of Public Health and other state agencies, as
appropriate, regarding (1) the availability of chimeric antigen receptor
T-cell therapy and other gene therapies in the state for the treatment of
cancer, (2) safe, equitable and financially sustainable delivery of such
therapies, (3) advanced training for clinical providers of such therapies,
Public Act No. 26-13 18 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(4) long-term follow-up and vector safety for patients receiving such
therapies, (5) the development of referral and management protocols for
such therapies, (6) education for clinicians, patients and patients'
relatives and caregivers regarding such therapies and such protocols, (7)
advising patients and their relatives and caregivers regarding the cost
and availability of insurance coverage for such therapies, (8)
opportunities for coordinating with research collaborations,
government agencies, including, but not limited to, the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, accrediting bodies and national
registries regarding such therapies, (9) the development of centers of
excellence in the state for the delivery of such therapies, including, but
not limited to, requiring accreditation of such centers, (10) the
development of a state-wide referral network to ensure all eligible
patients are matched with a center of excellence in the state, (11) the
development of safety protocols to address complications experienced
by patients receiving such therapies and other safety concerns, (12)
methods of providing psychosocial support to patients receiving such
therapies and their relatives and caregivers, and (13) methods of
tracking patient outcomes with a focus on equity as it relates to
diagnosis, race, ethnicity, geography and income.
(b) The council may perform the following functions:
(1) Consult with experts on chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy
and other gene therapies for the treatment of cancer to develop policy
recommendations for improving patient access to such therapies in the
state;
(2) Hold public hearings and otherwise make inquiries of and solicit
comments from the general public to assist with a study or survey of
persons living with cancer who have received such therapies, such
persons' caregivers and health care providers and patient advocates;
and
Public Act No. 26-13 19 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(3) Research and make recommendations to the Department of Public
Health and other state agencies.
(c) The council shall consist of the following members:
(1) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
(2) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee,
who may be the representative of a health carrier;
(3) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(4) The health information technology officer, designated in
accordance with section 19a-754a of the general statutes, or the officer's
designee;
(5) Four appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, one of whom shall be a hematologist or
oncologist providing services to adults, one of whom shall be a specialist
in emerging cellular and genetic therapy, one of whom shall be an
expert in pharmacology and one of whom shall be an advocate for
patients with a condition that is treated by gene therapy;
(6) Four appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, one of whom shall be a patient who has
received chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy, one of whom shall be
a representative of an association of hospitals in the state, one of whom
shall be a pediatric hematologist or oncologist and one of whom shall be
a community health equity advocate;
(7) Four appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint
Public Act No. 26-13 20 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public health, one of whom shall be a representative
of an internationally recognized accreditation body for institutions
providing cellular therapies, one of whom shall be a representative of
an association of health carriers in the state, one of whom shall be the
director of a cellular therapy program in the state and one of whom shall
be a representative of the life sciences or biotechnology industry; and
(8) Four appointed by the House ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public health, one of whom shall be a representative,
family member or caregiver of a person living with cancer who has
received gene therapy, one of whom shall be an advocate for cancer
patients in the state, one of whom shall be a social worker or patient
navigator and one of whom shall be a director of a transplant and
cellular therapy program in the state.
(d) All initial appointments to the council shall be made not later than
October 31, 2026. Except for members of the council who represent state
agencies, members shall serve for a term of three years and any vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority. The members shall receive
no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for any
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The
Commissioner of Public Health shall select an acting chairperson of the
council from its members for the purpose of organizing the first council
meeting. Such chairperson shall schedule and convene the first meeting,
which shall be held not later than November 30, 2026. The members of
the council shall appoint, by majority vote, a chairperson and vice-
chairperson during the first meeting of the council. Thereafter, the
council shall meet not less than quarterly in person or on a remote
platform, as determined by the chairperson.
(e) The council shall be within the Department of Public Health for
administrative purposes only.
Public Act No. 26-13 21 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(f) Not later than one year after the date of its first meeting, and
annually thereafter, the council shall report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health and insurance regarding its findings and
recommendations, including, but not limited to, (1) the council's
activities, research findings and any recommendations for proposed
legislative changes, and (2) any potential sources of funding for the
council's activities, including, but not limited to, grants, donations,
sponsorships or in-kind donations.
(g) The council may (1) apply for and accept grants, gifts, bequests,
sponsorships and in-kind donations of funds from federal and interstate
agencies, private firms, individuals and foundations for the purpose of
carrying out its responsibilities, and (2) enter into any contracts or
agreements, in accordance with any established procedures, as may be
necessary for the distribution or use of any received funds, services or
property in accordance with any requirements to fulfill any conditions
of a grant, gift, bequest, sponsorship or in-kind donation.
Sec. 15. Section 10-206 of the general statutes, as amended by section
39 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Each local or regional board of education shall require each pupil
enrolled in the public schools to have health assessments pursuant to
the provisions of this section. Such assessments shall be conducted by
(1) a legally qualified practitioner of medicine, (2) an advanced practice
registered nurse or registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378,
(3) a physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 370, (4) a school
medical advisor, or (5) a legally qualified practitioner of medicine, an
advanced practice registered nurse or a physician assistant stationed at
any military base, to ascertain whether such pupil is suffering from any
physical disability tending to prevent such pupil from receiving the full
Public Act No. 26-13 22 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
benefit of school work and to ascertain whether such school work
should be modified in order to prevent injury to the pupil or to secure
for the pupil a suitable program of education. No health assessment
shall be made of any pupil enrolled in the public schools unless such
examination is made in the presence of the parent or guardian or in the
presence of another school employee. The parent or guardian of such
pupil shall receive prior written notice and shall have a reasonable
opportunity to be present at such assessment or to provide for such
assessment himself or herself. A local or regional board of education
may deny continued attendance in public school to any pupil who fails
to obtain the health assessments required under this section.
(b) Each local or regional board of education shall require each pupil
to have a health assessment prior to public school enrollment. The
assessment shall include: (1) A physical examination [which] that shall
include hematocrit or hemoglobin tests, height, weight, blood pressure,
a medical risk assessment for lead poisoning and, when indicated by
such assessment, a test of the pupil's blood lead level, and, beginning
with the 2003-2004 school year, a chronic disease assessment which shall
include, but not be limited to, asthma. The assessment form shall
include (A) a check box for the provider conducting the assessment, as
provided in subsection (a) of this section, to indicate an asthma
diagnosis, (B) screening questions relating to appropriate public health
concerns to be answered by the parent or guardian, and (C) screening
questions to be answered by such provider; (2) an updating of
immunizations as required under section 10-204a, provided a registered
nurse may only update said immunizations pursuant to a written order
by a physician or physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 370,
or an advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter
378; (3) vision, hearing, speech and gross dental screenings; and (4) such
other information, including health and developmental history, as the
physician feels is necessary and appropriate. The assessment shall also
include tests for tuberculosis, sickle cell anemia and Cooley's anemia
Public Act No. 26-13 23 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
where the local or regional board of education determines after
consultation with the school medical advisor and the local health
department, or in the case of a regional board of education, each local
health department, that such tests are necessary, provided a registered
nurse may only perform said tests pursuant to the written order of a
physician or physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 370, or an
advanced practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378.
(c) Each local or regional board of education shall require each pupil
enrolled in the public schools to have health assessments in either grade
six or grade seven and in either grade nine or grade ten. The assessment
shall include: (1) A physical examination [which] that shall include
hematocrit or hemoglobin tests, height, weight, blood pressure, and,
beginning with the 2003-2004 school year, a chronic disease assessment
which shall include, but not be limited to, asthma as defined by the
Commissioner of Public Health pursuant to subsection (c) of section 19a-
62a, as amended by this act. The assessment form shall include (A) a
check box for the provider conducting the assessment, as provided in
subsection (a) of this section, to indicate an asthma diagnosis, (B)
screening questions relating to appropriate public health concerns to be
answered by the parent or guardian, and (C) screening questions to be
answered by such provider; (2) an updating of immunizations as
required under section 10-204a, provided a registered nurse may only
update said immunizations pursuant to a written order of a physician
or physician assistant, licensed pursuant to chapter 370, or an advanced
practice registered nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378; (3) vision,
hearing, postural and gross dental screenings; and (4) such other
information including a health history as the physician feels is necessary
and appropriate. The assessment shall also include tests for tuberculosis
and sickle cell anemia or Cooley's anemia where the local or regional
board of education, in consultation with the school medical advisor and
the local health department, or in the case of a regional board of
education, each local health department, determines that said screening
Public Act No. 26-13 24 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
or test is necessary, provided a registered nurse may only perform said
tests pursuant to the written order of a physician or physician assistant,
licensed pursuant to chapter 370, or an advanced practice registered
nurse, licensed pursuant to chapter 378.
(d) For the school year commencing July 1, 2027, and each school year
thereafter, each local or regional board of education shall require each
pupil enrolled in grades nine to twelve, inclusive, in the public schools
to have an athletics health assessment prior to being permitted to
participate in interscholastic athletics for each academic year. The
athletics assessment shall include a physical examination that shall
include screening for serious cardiac conditions that could lead to
sudden cardiac death, which screening shall be performed in
accordance with guidelines established by the American Heart
Association, the American College of Cardiology or another
organization focused on cardiovascular care in pediatric populations.
The athletics assessment form shall include (1) a check box for the
provider conducting the athletics assessment, as provided in subsection
(a) of this section, to indicate any patient or family history of symptoms
of such serious cardiac conditions, including, but not limited to, chest
pain with exertion or unexplained syncope, and any family history of
sudden cardiac death, (2) screening questions relating to a family
history of such serious cardiac issues to be answered by the parent or
guardian, including, but not limited to, chest pain with exertion,
unexplained syncope, sudden cardiac arrest or sudden cardiac death,
(3) any additional cardiac screening questions to be answered by such
provider, as deemed necessary and appropriate by such provider, and
(4) a check box for the provider conducting the athletics assessment to
indicate whether the provider referred the pupil for any additional
cardiac screening or treatment.
[(d)] (e) The results of each assessment done pursuant to this section
and the results of screenings done pursuant to section 10-214, as
Public Act No. 26-13 25 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
amended by [this act] public act 26-1, shall be recorded on forms
supplied by the State Board of Education. Each school nurse may reject
such results submitted on forms other than the forms supplied by the
State Board of Education and require the resubmission of such results
on such forms supplied by the State Board of Education. An asthma
action plan shall be included with each assessment form that indicates
an asthma diagnosis pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
Such information shall be included in the cumulative health record of
each pupil and shall be kept on file in the school such pupil attends. If a
pupil permanently leaves the jurisdiction of the board of education, the
pupil's original cumulative health record shall be sent to the chief
administrative officer of the school district to which such student
moves. The board of education transmitting such health record shall
retain a true copy. Each physician, advanced practice registered nurse,
registered nurse, or physician assistant performing health assessments
and screenings pursuant to this section and section 10-214, as amended
by [this act] public act 26-1, shall completely fill out and sign each form
and any recommendations concerning the pupil shall be in writing.
[(e)] (f) Appropriate school health personnel shall review the results
of each assessment and screening as recorded pursuant to subsection
[(d)] (e) of this section. When, in the judgment of such health personnel,
a pupil, as defined in section 10-206a, as amended by this act, is in need
of further testing or treatment, the superintendent of schools shall give
written notice to the parent or guardian of such pupil and shall make
reasonable efforts to assure that such further testing or treatment is
provided. Such reasonable efforts shall include a determination of
whether or not the parent or guardian has obtained the necessary testing
or treatment for the pupil, and, if not, advising the parent or guardian
on how such testing or treatment may be obtained. The results of such
further testing or treatment shall be recorded pursuant to subsection
[(d)] (e) of this section, and shall be reviewed by school health personnel
pursuant to this subsection.
Public Act No. 26-13 26 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
[(f)] (g) On and after October 1, 2017, each local or regional board of
education shall report to the local health department and the
Department of Public Health, on an triennial basis, the total number of
pupils per school and per school district having a diagnosis of asthma
(1) at the time of public school enrollment, (2) in grade six or seven, and
(3) in grade nine or ten. The report shall contain the asthma information
collected as required under subsections (b) and (c) of this section and
shall include pupil age, gender, race, ethnicity and school. Beginning on
October 1, 2021, and every three years thereafter, the Department of
Public Health shall review the asthma screening information reported
pursuant to this section and shall submit a report to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health and education concerning asthma trends and
distributions among pupils enrolled in the public schools. The report
shall be submitted in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
and shall include, but not be limited to, (A) trends and findings based
on pupil age, gender, race, ethnicity, school and the education reference
group, as determined by the Department of Education for the town or
regional school district in which such school is located, and (B) activities
of the asthma screening monitoring system maintained under section
19a-62a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 16. Section 10-206a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Each local or regional board of education shall provide for health
assessments pursuant to [subsection (c)] subsections (c) and (d) of
section 10-206, as amended by this act, without charge to all pupils
whose parents or guardians meet the eligibility requirements for free
and reduced price meals under the National School Lunch Program or
for free milk under the special milk program. To meet its obligations
pursuant to this section, a board of education may utilize existing
community resources and services.
Public Act No. 26-13 27 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Sec. 17. Section 19a-62a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Public Health shall maintain a system of
monitoring asthma screening information reported to the Department
of Public Health pursuant to subsection [(f)] (g) of section 10-206, as
amended by this act.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2021, and triennially thereafter, the
Department of Public Health shall post on its Internet web site the
activities of the asthma screening monitoring system maintained under
subsection (a) of this section, including a report of the information
obtained by the department pursuant to subsection [(f)] (g) of section
10-206, as amended by this act.
Sec. 18. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The University of
Connecticut Health Center's Health Disparities Institute, in consultation
with the Department of Public Health, persons who have experienced
symptoms of perimenopause, menopause and postmenopause, and
health care providers who treat persons with symptoms of
perimenopause, menopause and postmenopause, shall develop, within
available appropriations, a toolkit that provides practical, evidence-
based and culturally appropriate guidance to health care providers in
the state who are responsible for diagnosing or treating persons with
symptoms of menopause, perimenopause or postmenopause, as
determined by said institute, including, but not limited to, health care
providers in the fields of obstetrics, gynecology, internal medicine,
family medicine, emergency medicine, psychiatry, mental health, social
work, dentistry, dental hygiene and community health, regarding best
practices for screening, identification, clinical assessment, diagnosis and
treatment of symptoms of menopause, perimenopause and
postmenopause. Such guidance may include, but need not be limited to,
(1) a comprehensive description of the symptoms of menopause,
perimenopause and postmenopause, (2) evidence-based guidelines
Public Act No. 26-13 28 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
regarding the identification and treatment of such symptoms, including,
but not limited to, the use of hormones, such as hormone replacement
therapy and testosterone therapy, (3) the availability of insurance
coverage for such therapies, and (4) short education modules regarding
such guidance that would qualify as continuing education for such
health care providers.
(b) Not later than June 1, 2028, The University of Connecticut Health
Center's Health Disparities Institute shall distribute the toolkit
developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to such health care
providers. Not later than January 1, 2029, the institute shall (1) evaluate
any feedback received from such health care providers regarding the
effectiveness of the toolkit, (2) revise the toolkit as necessary to address
such feedback, and (3) distribute a revised toolkit, if any, to such health
care providers.
Sec. 19. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Designated employee" means a school nurse or nurse practitioner
appointed pursuant to section 10-212 of the general statutes, school
nurse supervisor, school counselor, school social worker or school
psychologist who a local or regional school board of education
designates to access safety plans of minor patients transmitted by health
care providers to a school district or school's secure messaging system
account pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) "Health care provider" means any person, corporation, limited
liability company, facility or institution operated, owned or licensed by
this state to provide health care or professional medical services;
(3) "Legally authorized representative" means a minor patient's
parent, guardian appointed by the Probate Court or a personal
representative, as described in 45 CFR 164.502(g);
(4) "Safety plan" means a written document created collaboratively
Public Act No. 26-13 29 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
between a health care provider and a patient outlining coping strategies,
activities and support networks the patient can access to prevent or
manage a potential mental health crisis;
(5) "School nurse supervisor" means a school nurse or nurse
practitioner appointed pursuant to section 10-212 of the general statutes
designated by the local or regional board of education as the supervisor,
or, if no designation has been made by the board, the lead or
coordinating school nurse or nurse practitioner; and
(6) "Secure messaging system" means a platform capable of sending
and receiving secure messages and may include a platform that
complies with the Direct Project specifications published by the federal
Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology.
(b) On and after April 1, 2027, each health care provider that prepares
a safety plan for a minor patient who received inpatient behavioral
health care treatment for a period not less than twelve consecutive days
shall (1) review such safety plan with the minor patient if the health care
provider believes such a review is medically appropriate, and (2)
inquire as to whether the minor patient or minor patient's parent or
legally authorized representative consents to sharing such safety plan
with the minor patient's school. If the minor patient or minor patient's
parent or legally authorized representative consents to sharing such
safety plan with the minor patient's school, the health care provider
shall obtain written consent from (A) the minor patient's parent or
legally authorized representative, or (B) if the minor patient is sixteen
years of age or older, such minor patient, and transmit such safety plan
to the minor patient's school district or school (i) using a secure
messaging system, or (ii) in a form and manner that complies with the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-
191, as amended from time to time, and 45 CFR 160.101 to 45 CFR
164.534, inclusive, as amended from time to time.
Public Act No. 26-13 30 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) create a standard
of medical care with respect to any minor patient, (2) require a health
care provider to create a safety plan, (3) require a health care provider
to release information to a parent or legally authorized representative if,
pursuant to state or federal law, a minor patient may withhold such
information from such minor patient's parent or legally authorized
representative, including, but not limited to, information regarding
pregnancy, abortion, contraceptives, human immunodeficiency virus or
other sexually transmitted disease testing or treatment, mental health
treatment or any other area of care that a health care provider has
promised a minor patient that the health care provider will keep
confidential, or (4) require a health care provider to transmit a safety
plan or provide any other information to any person in violation of the
provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time.
Sec. 20. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) On or before January 1, 2027,
each local or regional board of education shall ensure that each school
district or school, as determined by the board, (1) signs up for an
organizational account on a secure messaging system, as defined in
section 19 of this act, and (2) provides access to one or more designated
employees, as defined in section 19 of this act, one of whom shall be a
school nurse supervisor, as defined in section 19 of this act, to such
organizational account for the purpose of accessing minor patient safety
plans, as defined in section 19 of this act, transmitted by health care
providers, pursuant to the provisions of section 19 of this act. A
designated employee shall retain minor patient safety plans in a
confidential file separate from any cumulative academic or health
record, provided information contained in a minor patient safety plan
may be used to provide appropriate interventions pursuant to an
individualized education program or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973.
Public Act No. 26-13 31 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(b) On or before April 1, 2027, each local or regional board of
education shall submit each school district or school's secure messaging
system address to the Commissioner of Education in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner. On and after April 1, 2027, if a school
district or school's secure messaging system address changes, each local
or regional board of education shall, in a form and manner prescribed
by the commissioner, submit such new address to the commissioner as
soon as practicable but not later than thirty days after acquiring such
new address. The commissioner shall compile and maintain a list of each
school district or school's secure messaging system address and make
such list available to health care providers in the state for the purpose of
transmitting minor patient safety plans pursuant to the provisions of
section 19 of this act.
Sec. 21. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) For the school year commencing
July 1, 2027, and each school year thereafter, each local and regional
board of education shall provide guidance regarding the requirements
of section 19 of this act for all new designated employees, as defined in
section 19 of this act. The Department of Education shall develop and
make available such guidance and training materials for use by each
local and regional board of education. Such materials shall include
instruction for using a secure messaging system for the purpose of
accessing minor patient safety plans, as defined in section 19 of this act,
transmitted by health care providers pursuant to the provisions of
section 19 of this act.
Sec. 22. Subsection (b) of section 17b-59d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) It shall be the goal of the State-wide Health Information Exchange
to: (1) Allow real-time, secure access to patient health information and
complete medical records across all health care provider settings; (2)
provide patients with secure electronic access to their health
Public Act No. 26-13 32 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
information in accordance with 45 CFR 171; (3) allow voluntary
participation by patients to access their health information at no cost; (4)
support care coordination through real-time alerts and timely access to
clinical information; (5) reduce costs associated with preventable
readmissions, duplicative testing and medical errors; (6) promote the
highest level of interoperability; (7) meet all state and federal privacy
and security requirements; (8) support public health reporting, quality
improvement, academic research and health care delivery and payment
reform through data aggregation and analytics; (9) support population
health analytics; (10) be standards-based; [and] (11) provide for broad
local governance that (A) includes stakeholders, including, but not
limited to, representatives of the Department of Social Services,
hospitals, physicians, behavioral health care providers, long-term care
providers, health insurers, employers, patients and academic or medical
research institutions, and (B) is committed to the successful
development and implementation of the State-wide Health Information
Exchange; and (12) provide, within available appropriations, (A) a
secure messaging system organizational account to each school district
or school, as determined by each local and regional board of education,
for the purposes of receiving minor patient safety plans pursuant to the
provisions of section 19 of this act, and (B) access to such organizational
account for designated employees, as defined in section 19 of this act, at
no cost to such school district, school and designated employee.
Sec. 23. Section 20-102aa of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2027):
As used in subsection (c) of section 19a-14 and sections 20-102aa to
20-102ff, inclusive, as amended by this act:
(1) "Abuse" means any act of abuse, as defined in 42 CFR 483.5, as
amended from time to time, committed towards a client, resident or
patient;
Public Act No. 26-13 33 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
[(1)] (2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health;
(3) "Neglect" means any act of neglect, as defined in 42 CFR 483.5, as
amended from time to time, committed towards a client, resident or
patient;
[(2) "nurse's aide"] (4) "Nurse's aide" means [an individual providing]
a registered nurse's aide who provides nursing or nursing-related
services [to residents in a chronic and convalescent nursing home or rest
home with nursing supervision] pursuant to such nurse's aide's
employment or contract with an institution, as defined in section 19a-
490, as amended by this act, but does not include an individual who is a
health professional otherwise licensed or certified by the Department of
Public Health, or who volunteers to provide such services without
monetary compensation;
[(3) "registration"] (5) "Registration" means a document issued by the
Department of Public Health to a nurse's aide which certifies that such
aide has satisfied the training and competency evaluation requirements
prescribed by the commissioner; [and has been found qualified for
employment in a chronic and convalescent nursing home or rest home
with nursing supervision;] and
[(4) "registered nurse's aide"] (6) "Registered nurse's aide" means an
individual who has been issued a registration as defined in this section.
Sec. 24. Subsection (a) of section 20-102cc of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2027):
(a) The Department of Public Health shall receive, investigate and
prosecute complaints against individuals who are providing or have
provided services as a nurse's aide in [a chronic and convalescent
nursing home or rest home with nursing supervision] an institution, as
defined in section 19a-490, as amended by this act. The grounds for
Public Act No. 26-13 34 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
complaint shall include [resident abuse, resident neglect,] (1) illegal,
incompetent or negligent conduct in the provision of nursing or
nursing-related services, (2) abuse of a resident, patient or client, (3)
neglect of a resident, patient or client, (4) misappropriation of resident,
patient or client property, and (5) fraud or deceit in obtaining or
attempting to obtain a registration as a nurse's aide. A nurse's aide shall
be given written notice by certified mail by the commissioner of any
complaint against him or her. The department may summarily suspend
a nurse's aide's ability to practice in advance of a final adjudication on a
complaint or during the appeals process in accordance with subsection
(c) of section 19a-17. A nurse's aide who wishes to appeal a complaint
against him or her shall, not later than thirty days after the date of the
mailing, file with the department a request in writing for a hearing to
contest the complaint. The commissioner shall render a finding on such
complaint, and, if a hearing is requested, it shall be conducted pursuant
to chapter 54. The commissioner shall have the authority to take any
action against a nurse's aide set forth in section 19a-17, as amended by
this act, and to render a finding and enter such finding on the registry
against an individual who is providing or has provided services as a
nurse's aide, [in a chronic and convalescent nursing home or rest home
with nursing supervision,] without regard to whether such individual
is on the registry or has obtained registration as a nurse's aide from the
department.
Sec. 25. Section 19a-17 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subsection (i) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
(NEW) (i) Such board or commission or the department may take any
of the actions permitted under this section against a practitioner for
failure to fulfill any material obligation resulting from the receipt of
funds provided by the department pursuant to the Rural Health
Transformation Program established pursuant to 42 USC 1397ee(h).
Sec. 26. Section 31-57e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
Public Act No. 26-13 35 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
is amended by adding subsection (f) as follows (Effective from passage):
(NEW) (f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the
provision of funds to a tribe pursuant to the Rural Health
Transformation Program established pursuant to 42 USC 1397ee(h).
Sec. 27. Subsection (a) of section 20-102ee of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2027):
(a) The Commissioner of Public Health shall adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, concerning the regulation
of nurse's aides. Such regulations shall require a training program for
nurse's aides of not less than one hundred hours. Not less than seventy-
five of such hours shall include, but not be limited to, basic nursing
skills, personal care skills, care of cognitively impaired [residents]
patients, recognition of mental health and social service needs, basic
restorative services and [residents'] patients' rights. Not less than
twenty-five of such hours shall include, but not be limited to, specialized
training in understanding and responding to challenging behaviors
related to physical, psychiatric, psychosocial and cognitive disorders.
On and after January 1, 2022, not less than two of such hours shall
include (1) screening for post-traumatic stress disorder, risk of suicide,
depression and grief, and (2) suicide prevention training offered or
approved by the American Nurses Association, Connecticut Hospital
Association, Connecticut Nurses Association or Connecticut League for
Nursing, a specialty nursing society or equivalent organization in
another jurisdiction, a hospital or other health care institution, a
regionally accredited academic institution, or a state or local health
department. The requirement described in subdivision (2) of this section
may be satisfied by the completion of the evidence-based youth suicide
prevention training program administered pursuant to section 17a-52a.
Sec. 28. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Recognition of
Public Act No. 26-13 36 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact
shall be enacted into law and entered into by the state of Connecticut
with any and all states legally joining therein in accordance with its
terms not earlier than one year after the date on which such compact is
enacted in at least one of the states of Massachusetts, New York or
Rhode Island. The compact is substantially as follows:
RECOGNITION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
In order to protect the public through verification of competency and
ensure accountability for patient care related activities, all states license
emergency medical services (EMS) personnel, such as emergency
medical technicians (EMTs), advanced EMTs and paramedics. This
compact is intended to facilitate the day-to-day movement of EMS
personnel across state boundaries in the performance of their EMS
duties as assigned by an appropriate authority and authorize state EMS
offices to afford immediate legal recognition to EMS personnel licensed
in a member state.
This compact recognizes that states have a vested interest in
protecting the public's health and safety through their licensing and
regulation of EMS personnel and that such state regulation shared
among the member states will best protect public health and safety. This
compact is designed to achieve the following purposes and objectives:
(1) Increase public access to EMS personnel;
(2) Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's health and safety,
especially patient safety;
(3) Encourage the cooperation of member states in the areas of EMS
personnel licensure and regulation;
Public Act No. 26-13 37 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(4) Support licensing of military members who are separating from
an active-duty tour and their spouses;
(5) Facilitate the exchange of information between member states
regarding EMS personnel licensure, adverse action and significant
investigatory information;
(6) Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel
practice in each member state; and
(7) Invest all member states with the authority to hold EMS personnel
accountable through the mutual recognition of member state licenses.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in section 1, this section and sections 3 to 15, inclusive, of
the compact:
(1) "Advanced emergency medical technician" or "AEMT" means an
individual licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice
that corresponds to that level in the National EMS Education Standards
and National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
(2) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a state's laws that may be imposed against
licensed EMS personnel by a state EMS authority or state court,
including, but not limited to, actions against an individual's license such
as revocation, suspension, probation, consent agreement, monitoring or
other limitation or encumbrance on the individual's practice, letters of
reprimand or admonition, fines, criminal convictions and state court
judgments enforcing adverse actions by the state EMS authority.
(3) "Alternative program" means a voluntary, nondisciplinary
substance abuse recovery program approved by a state EMS authority.
(4) "Certification" means the successful verification of entry-level
Public Act No. 26-13 38 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
cognitive and psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated and
legally defensible examination.
(5) "Commission" means the national administrative body of which
all states that have enacted the compact are members.
(6) "Emergency medical technician" or "EMT" means an individual
licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice that
corresponds to that level in the National EMS Education Standards and
National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
(7) "Home state" means a member state where an individual is
licensed to practice emergency medical services.
(8) "License" means the authorization by a state for an individual to
practice as an EMT, AEMT or paramedic, or a level between EMT and
paramedic.
(9) "Medical director" means a physician licensed in a member state
who is accountable for the care delivered by EMS personnel.
(10) "Member state" means a state that has enacted this compact.
(11) "Privilege to practice" means an individual's authority to deliver
emergency medical services in remote states as authorized under this
compact.
(12) "Paramedic" means an individual licensed with cognitive
knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the
National EMS Education Standards and National EMS Scope of Practice
Model.
(13) "Remote state" means a member state in which an individual is
not licensed.
(14) "Restricted" means the outcome of an adverse action that limits a
Public Act No. 26-13 39 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
license or the privilege to practice.
(15) "Rule" means a written statement by the Interstate Commission
promulgated pursuant to section 12 of this compact that (A) is of general
applicability, (B) implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or
provision of the compact, or (C) is an organizational, procedural or
practice requirement of the Commission, and (D) has the force and effect
of statutory law in a member state and includes the amendment, repeal
or suspension of an existing rule.
(16) "Scope of practice" means defined parameters of various duties
or services that may be provided by an individual with specific
credentials. Whether regulated by rule, statute or court decision, it tends
to represent the limits of services an individual may perform.
(17) "Significant investigatory information" means:
(A) Investigative information that a state EMS authority, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to
respond if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proved true,
would result in the imposition of an adverse action on a license or
privilege to practice; or
(B) Investigative information that indicates that the individual
represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of
whether the individual has been notified and had an opportunity to
respond.
(18) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of
the United States.
(19) "State EMS authority" means the board, office or other agency
with the legislative mandate to license EMS personnel.
SECTION 3. HOME STATE LICENSURE
Public Act No. 26-13 40 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(a) Any member state in which an individual holds a current license
shall be deemed a home state for purposes of this compact.
(b) Any member state may require an individual to obtain and retain
a license to be authorized to practice in the member state under
circumstances not authorized by the privilege to practice under the
terms of this compact.
(c) A home state's license authorizes an individual to practice in a
remote state under the privilege to practice only if the home state:
(1) Currently requires the use of the National Registry of Emergency
Medical Technicians (NREMT) examination as a condition of issuing
initial licenses at the EMT and paramedic levels;
(2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about individuals;
(3) Notifies the Commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of
any adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding an
individual;
(4) Not later than five years after activation of the compact, requires
a criminal background check of all applicants for initial licensure,
including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric data
checks compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation with the exception of federal employees who have
suitability determination in accordance with US CFR 731.202 and
submit documentation of such as promulgated in the rules of the
Commission; and
(5) Complies with the rules of the Commission.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
(a) Member states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an
Public Act No. 26-13 41 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
individual licensed in another member state that is in conformance with
section 3 of this compact.
(b) To exercise the privilege to practice under the terms and
provisions of this compact, an individual shall:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Possess a current unrestricted license in a member state as an
EMT, AEMT, paramedic or state-recognized and licensed level with a
scope of practice and authority between EMT and paramedic; and
(3) Practice under the supervision of a medical director.
(c) An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the
privilege to practice shall function within the scope of practice
authorized by the home state unless and until modified by an
appropriate authority in the remote state as may be defined in the rules
of the Commission.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, an individual
practicing in a remote state shall be subject to the remote state's
authority and laws. A remote state may, in accordance with due process
and that state's laws, restrict, suspend or revoke an individual's
privilege to practice in the remote state and may take any other
necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. If a
remote state takes action, it shall promptly notify the home state and the
Commission.
(e) If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or
suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote
state under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state
license is restored.
(f) If an individual's privilege to practice in any remote state is
Public Act No. 26-13 42 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
restricted, suspended or revoked, the individual shall not be eligible to
practice in any remote state until the individual's privilege to practice is
restored.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS OF PRACTICE IN A REMOTE STATE
An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to
practice only in the performance of the individual's EMS duties as
assigned by an appropriate authority, as defined in the rules of the
Commission, and under the following circumstances:
(1) The individual originates a patient transport in a home state and
transports the patient to a remote state;
(2) The individual originates in the home state and enters a remote
state to pick up a patient and provide care and transport of the patient
to the home state;
(3) The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care or
transport within that remote state;
(4) The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient and
provide care and transport to a third member state; or
(5) Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the
Commission.
SECTION 6. RELATIONSHIP TO EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
ASSISTANCE COMPACT
Upon a member state's Governor's declaration of a state of emergency
or disaster that activates the Emergency Management Assistance
Compact (EMAC), all relevant terms and provisions of EMAC shall
apply and to the extent any terms or provisions of this compact conflict
with EMAC, the terms of EMAC shall prevail with respect to any
individual practicing in the remote state in response to such declaration.
Public Act No. 26-13 43 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
SECTION 7. VETERANS, SERVICE MEMBERS SEPARATING
FROM ACTIVE-DUTY MILITARY AND THEIR SPOUSES
(a) Member states shall consider a veteran, active military service
member and member of the National Guard and Reserve separating
from an active-duty tour, and a spouse thereof, who holds a current
valid and unrestricted NREMT certification at or above the level of the
state license being sought as satisfying the minimum training and
examination requirements for such licensure.
(b) Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure
applications submitted by veterans, active military service members
and members of the National Guard and Reserve separating from an
active-duty tour, and their spouses.
(c) All individuals functioning with a privilege to practice under this
section shall remain subject to the adverse actions provisions of section
8 of this compact.
SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action
against an individual's license issued by the home state.
(b) If an individual's license in any home state is restricted or
suspended, the individual shall not be eligible to practice in a remote
state under the privilege to practice until the individual's home state
license is restored.
(1) All home state adverse action orders shall include a statement that
the individual's compact privileges are inactive. The order may allow
the individual to practice in remote states with prior written
authorization from both the home state and the remote state's EMS
authority.
Public Act No. 26-13 44 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(2) An individual currently subject to adverse action in the home state
shall not practice in any remote state without prior written
authorization from both the home state and the remote state's EMS
authority.
(c) A member state shall report adverse actions and any occurrences
that the individual's compact privileges are restricted, suspended or
revoked to the Commission in accordance with the rules of the
Commission.
(d) A remote state may take adverse action on an individual's
privilege to practice within that state.
(e) Any member state may take adverse action against an individual's
privilege to practice in that state based on the factual findings of another
member state, so long as each state follows its own procedures for
imposing such adverse action.
(f) A home state's EMS authority shall investigate and take
appropriate action with respect to reported conduct in a remote state as
it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In such
cases, the home state's law shall control in determining the appropriate
adverse action.
(g) Nothing in this compact shall override a member state's decision
that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of
adverse action and that such participation shall remain nonpublic if
required by the member state's laws. Member states shall require
individuals who enter any alternative programs to agree not to practice
in any other member state during the term of the alternative program
without prior authorization from such other member state.
SECTION 9. ADDITIONAL POWERS INVESTED IN A MEMBER
STATE'S EMS AUTHORITY
Public Act No. 26-13 45 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
A member state's EMS authority, in addition to any other powers
granted under state law, is authorized under this compact to:
(1) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of
evidence. Subpoenas issued by a member state's EMS authority for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence
from another member state shall be enforced in the remote state by any
court of competent jurisdiction according to that court's practice and
procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own proceedings. The
issuing state's EMS authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses,
mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where
the witnesses or evidence are located; and
(2) Issue cease and desist orders to restrict, suspend or revoke an
individual's privilege to practice in the state.
SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE
(a) The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public
agency known as the Interstate Commission for EMS Personnel Practice.
(1) The Commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the
compact states.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is
located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses
to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute
resolution proceedings.
(3) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity.
Public Act No. 26-13 46 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(b) Membership, voting and meetings
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate. The
responsible official of the state EMS authority, or such official's
designee, shall be the delegate to this compact for each member state.
Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by
the law of the state from which the delegate is appointed. Any vacancy
occurring in the Commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws
of the member state in which the vacancy exists. In the event that more
than one board, office or other agency with the legislative mandate to
license EMS personnel at and above the level of EMT exists, the
Governor of the state shall determine which entity will be responsible
for assigning the delegate.
(2) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the
promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have
an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the
Commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates'
participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
(3) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
(4) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of
meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
rulemaking provisions in section 12 of this compact.
(5) The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if
the Commission intends to discuss:
(A) Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the
compact;
Public Act No. 26-13 47 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(B) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other
matters related to the Commission's internal personnel practices and
procedures;
(C) Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(D) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services
or real estate;
(E) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(F) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
(G) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(H) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
(I) Disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination
of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or
(J) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
member state statute.
(6) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this
provision, the Commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that
the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting
provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including
a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in
Public Act No. 26-13 48 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All
minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
subject to release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a
court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) (1) The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the delegates,
prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or
appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of the
compact, including, but not limited to:
(A) Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
(B) Providing reasonable standards and procedures (i) for the
establishment and meetings of other committees, and (ii) governing any
general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the
Commission;
(C) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting
meetings of the Commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all
meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings
by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect
the public's interest, the privacy of individuals and proprietary
information, including trade secrets. The Commission may meet in
closed session only after a majority of the membership votes to close a
meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the Commission
shall make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the
vote of each member with no proxy votes allowed;
(D) Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable
procedures for the election of the officers of the Commission;
(E) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the
establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the
Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of
any member state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel
Public Act No. 26-13 49 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
policies and programs of the Commission;
(F) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and
prohibited activities of Commission members and employees; and
(G) Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the
Commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that
may exist after the termination of the compact and after the payment or
reserving of all of its debts and obligations.
(2) The Commission shall publish its bylaws and file a copy thereof,
and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or
officer in each of the member states, if any.
(3) The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance
with the bylaws.
(4) The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent
with the provisions of this Compact and the bylaws.
(d) The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this compact. The
rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all
member states;
(2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name
of the Commission, provided the standing of any state EMS authority or
other regulatory body responsible for EMS personnel licensure to sue or
be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(4) To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including,
but not limited to, employees of a member state;
Public Act No. 26-13 50 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(5) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties and grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry
out the purposes of the compact and to establish the Commission's
personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
(6) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money,
equipment, supplies, materials and services and to receive, utilize and
dispose of the same, provided at all times the Commission shall strive
to avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(7) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of or
otherwise to own, hold, improve or use any property, real, personal or
mixed, provided at all times the Commission shall strive to avoid any
appearance of impropriety;
(8) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal or mixed;
(9) To establish a budget and make expenditures;
(10) To borrow money;
(11) To appoint committees, including advisory committees,
comprised of members, state regulators, state legislators or their
representatives and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws;
(12) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with,
law enforcement agencies;
(13) To adopt and use an official seal; and
(14) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the
state regulation of EMS personnel licensure and practice.
Public Act No. 26-13 51 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(e) Financing of the Commission
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing
activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources, donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials
and services.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost
of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which
shall be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as
approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources.
The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon
a formula to be determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate
a rule binding upon all member states.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the
authority of the member state.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall
be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its
bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by
the Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public
accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become
part of the annual report of the Commission.
(f) Qualified immunity, defense and indemnification
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and
Public Act No. 26-13 52 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for
damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission
that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, provided nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or
liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional
or wilful or wanton misconduct of that person.
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee or representative of the Commission in any civil
action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities,
provided nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining his or her own counsel, and, provided further, the actual or
alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or wilful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee or representative of the
Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties
or responsibilities, provided the actual or alleged act, error or omission
did not result from the intentional or wilful or wanton misconduct of
that person.
Public Act No. 26-13 53 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
SECTION 11. COORDINATED DATABASE
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development and
maintenance of a coordinated database and reporting system containing
licensure, adverse action and significant investigatory information on
all licensed individuals in member states.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary,
a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated
database on all individuals to whom this compact is applicable as
required by the rules of the Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Significant investigatory information;
(4) Adverse actions against an individual's license;
(5) An indicator that an individual's privilege to practice is restricted,
suspended or revoked;
(6) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program
participation;
(7) Any denial of application for licensure and the reason or reasons
for such denial; and
(8) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(c) The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all
member states of any adverse action taken against, or significant
investigative information on, any individual in a member state.
(d) Member states contributing information to the coordinated
Public Act No. 26-13 54 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
database may designate information that shall not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing state.
(e) Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the member state
contributing the information shall be removed from the coordinated
database.
SECTION 12. RULEMAKING
(a) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to
the criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder.
Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in
each rule or amendment.
(b) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule,
by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt
the compact, such rule shall have no further force and effect in any
member state.
(c) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or
special meeting of the Commission.
(d) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
Commission, and at least sixty days in advance of the meeting at which
the rule will be considered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
(1) On the Internet web site of the Commission; and
(2) On the Internet web site of each member state's EMS authority or
in the publication in which each state would otherwise publish
proposed rules.
(e) The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
Public Act No. 26-13 55 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(1) The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the
rule will be considered and voted upon;
(2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for
the proposed rule;
(3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested
person; and
(4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the
Commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any
written comments.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow
persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which
shall be made available to the public.
(g) The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing
before it adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
(1) At least twenty-five persons;
(2) A governmental subdivision or agency; or
(3) An association having at least twenty-five members.
(h) If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the
Commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled
public hearing.
(1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the
executive director of the Commission or other designated member in
writing of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing not less than
five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
(2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person
Public Act No. 26-13 56 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment
orally or in writing.
(3) No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request
for a transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the
transcript shall bear the cost of producing the transcript. A recording
may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions
as a transcript. This subdivision shall not preclude the Commission from
making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the
Commission at hearings required by this section.
(i) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business
on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the
Commission shall consider all written and oral comments received.
(j) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the
rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
(k) If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by
interested parties is received, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule without a public hearing.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission
may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice,
opportunity for comment or hearing, provided the usual rulemaking
procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no
event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For the
purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be
adopted immediately in order to:
Public Act No. 26-13 57 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule
that is established by federal law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission
may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for
purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in
consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall
be posted on the Internet web site of the Commission. The revision shall
be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after
posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the
revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end
of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect
without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision shall
not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND
ENFORCEMENT
(a) Oversight
(1) The executive, legislative and judicial branches of state
government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take
all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's
purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact and the rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.
(2) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in
any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining
Public Act No. 26-13 58 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
to the subject matter of this compact that may affect the powers,
responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in such a
proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the
Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Commission, this compact or promulgated rules.
(b) Default, technical assistance and termination
(1) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted
in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this
compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission shall:
(A) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member
states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the
default and any other action to be taken by the Commission; and
(B) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance
regarding the default.
(2) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state
may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits
conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(3) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted.
Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the
Commission to the Governor and the majority and minority leaders of
the defaulting state's legislature, and each of the member states.
Public Act No. 26-13 59 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
(4) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of
termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
(5) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact,
unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the
defaulting state.
(6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal offices.
The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney's fees.
(c) Dispute resolution
(1) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states
and between member and nonmember states.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(d) Enforcement
(1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions and rules of this compact.
(2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the Commission has its principal offices against a member
state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact
and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include
Public Act No. 26-13 60 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or state law.
SECTION 14. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INTERSTATE
COMMISSION FOR EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE AND
ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT
(a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. The
provisions, which become effective at that time, shall be limited to the
powers granted to the Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and
exercise rulemaking powers necessary to the implementation and
administration of the compact.
(b) Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the Commission's
initial adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on
the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that
has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state.
(c) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting
a statute repealing the same.
(1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state's EMS authority to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective
Public Act No. 26-13 61 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
date of withdrawal.
(d) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any EMS personnel licensure agreement or other
cooperative arrangement between a member state and a nonmember
state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
(e) This compact may be amended by the member states. No
amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon
any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the
purposes thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the
constitution of any state member thereto, the compact shall remain in
full force and effect as to the remaining member states. Nothing in this
compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of EMS
agencies.
Sec. 29. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) On and after one year after
the date on which the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact is enacted in at least one of the
states of Massachusetts, New York or Rhode Island, in accordance with
the provisions of section 28 of this act, the Commissioner of Public
Health shall require any applicant for licensure or certification pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 384d of the general statutes to submit to
criminal history records checks, including state and national criminal
history records checks, in accordance with the provisions of section 29-
17a of the general statutes as a condition of licensure or certification.
Sec. 30. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than five years after
the date on which the provisions of section 28 of this act are
implemented, the Commissioner of Public Health, in consultation with
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, shall submit a
Public Act No. 26-13 62 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
report on such implementation, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health. Such report shall include an assessment on the impact of the
implementation of such provisions on the state's emergency medical
services workforce and patients' access to medical care and make
recommendations to further support emergency medical services
workforce development.
Sec. 31. Subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 19a-37 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) Any laboratory or firm which conducts a water quality test on
a private well serving a residential property or semipublic well in the
state shall, not later than thirty days after the completion of such test,
report the results of such test to the local health authority of the
municipality where the property is located and the Department of
Public Health in a format specified by the department. Results
submitted to the Department of Public Health or the local health
authority pursuant to this subsection, information obtained from any
Department of Public Health or local health authority investigation
regarding those results and any Department of Public Health or local
health authority study of morbidity and mortality regarding the results
shall be confidential pursuant to section 19a-25, except the local health
authority and the department may [, if approved by the commissioner,]
disclose the results or information obtained from an investigation of the
results to (A) the owner of the property on which the well is located, the
owner of any other property that obtains water from the well, and the
owner of each property that is adjacent to the property on which the
well is located or to any other property that obtains water from the well,
(B) a prospective buyer of such property who has signed a contract to
purchase such property, (C) other persons or entities, when such
Public Act No. 26-13 63 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
disclosure is necessary to carry out a statutory or regulatory
responsibility of the local health authority or department, [or] and (D)
an agent of a state agency.
Sec. 32. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1,
2027, (1) the Division of Emergency Management and Homeland
Security within the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, in consultation with the Departments of Housing, Social
Services and Mental Health and Addiction Services, the 2-1-1 Infoline
operated by the United Way of Connecticut, and the Connecticut
Coalition to End Homelessness, shall develop guidance, in consultation
with the Office of the Governor, the Office of Policy and Management
and municipal leaders, regarding (A) extreme hot and cold weather
protocols that may include, but need not limited to, weather factors,
such as temperatures and wind chill, that will prompt the state and
municipalities to open cooling centers and warming centers throughout
the state, and (B) improvements to methods of communicating to the
public during the activation of extreme hot and cold weather protocols,
and (2) the Department of Housing, in consultation with the
Departments of Social Services and Mental Health and Addiction
Services, shall develop methods of improving outreach to unhoused
individuals during extreme hot and cold weather events based on an
evaluation conducted by the Department of Housing in conjunction
with providers of services to such individuals.
Sec. 33. Section 20-112a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Direct supervision" means a licensed dentist has authorized
certain procedures to be performed on a patient by a dental assistant or
an expanded function dental assistant with such dentist remaining on-
site in the dental office or treatment facility while such procedures are
Public Act No. 26-13 64 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
being performed by the dental assistant or expanded function dental
assistant and that, prior to the patient's departure from the dental office,
such dentist reviews and approves the treatment performed by the
dental assistant or expanded function dental assistant;
(2) "Indirect supervision" means a licensed dentist is in the dental
office or treatment facility, has personally diagnosed the condition,
planned the treatment, authorized the procedures to be performed and
remains in the dental office or treatment facility while the procedures
are being performed by the dental assistant or expanded function dental
assistant and evaluates the performance of the dental assistant or
expanded function dental assistant;
(3) "Dental assistant" means a person who: (A) Has (i) completed on-
the-job training in dental assisting under direct supervision, (ii)
successfully completed a dental assistant education program accredited
by the American Dental Association's Commission on Dental
Accreditation, or (iii) successfully completed a dental assistant
education program that is accredited or recognized by any national or
regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education; and (B) meets any requirements established
by the Commissioner of Public Health in regulations adopted pursuant
to subsection (f) of this section;
(4) "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental assistant
who has passed the Dental Assisting National Board's certified dental
assistant or certified orthodontic assistant examination and then
successfully completed: (A) An expanded function dental assistant
program at an institution of higher education that is accredited by the
Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental
Association that includes (i) educational courses relating to didactic and
laboratory preclinical objectives for skills used by an expanded function
dental assistant and that requires demonstration of such skills prior to
advancing to clinical practice, (ii) not less than four hours of education
Public Act No. 26-13 65 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
in the area of ethics and professional standards for dental professionals,
and (iii) a comprehensive clinical examination administered by the
institution of higher education at the conclusion of such program; and
(B) a comprehensive written examination concerning certified
preventive functions and certified restorative functions administered by
the Dental Assisting National Board; and
(5) "Fluoride varnish treatment" means the application of a highly
concentrated form of fluoride to the surface of the teeth.
(b) Each expanded function dental assistant shall: (1) Maintain dental
assistant or orthodontic assistant certification from the Dental Assisting
National Board; (2) conspicuously display his or her dental assistant or
orthodontic assistant certificate at his or her place of employment or
place where he or she provides expanded function dental assistant
services; (3) maintain professional liability insurance or other indemnity
against liability for professional malpractice in an amount not less than
five hundred thousand dollars for one person, per occurrence, with an
aggregate liability of not less than one million five hundred thousand
dollars while employed as an expanded function dental assistant; (4)
provide expanded function dental assistant services only under direct
or indirect supervision; and (5) meet any requirements established by
the Commissioner of Public Health in regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section.
(c) (1) A licensed dentist may delegate to a dental [assistants] assistant
such dental procedures as the dentist may deem advisable, including:
(A) The taking of dental x-rays if the dental assistant can demonstrate
successful completion of the dental radiation health and safety
examination administered by the Dental Assisting National Board or a
radiation health and safety competency assessment administered by a
dental education program in the state that is accredited by the American
Dental Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation; (B) the
taking of impressions of teeth for study models; and (C) the provision
Public Act No. 26-13 66 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
of fluoride varnish treatments. [Such procedures] A dentist delegating
the taking of dental x-rays pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision shall approve the taking of dental x-rays by the dental
assistant and assume responsibility for such procedure, but need not
remain on-site in the dental office or treatment facility while the dental
assistant performs such procedure. The procedures described in
subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this subdivision shall be performed under
the direct supervision of a licensed dentist and the dentist providing
direct supervision shall assume responsibility for such procedures.
(2) A licensed dentist may delegate to an expanded function dental
assistant such dental procedures as the dentist may deem advisable,
including: (A) The placing, finishing and adjustment of temporary
restorations and long-term individual fillings, capping materials and
cement bases; (B) oral health education for patients; (C) dental sealants;
(D) coronal polishing, provided the procedure is not represented or
billed as prophylaxis; (E) administration of topical anesthetic under the
direct supervision of the dentist prior to the administration of local
anesthetic by a dentist or dental hygienist; and (F) taking alginate
impressions of teeth, under the direct supervision of the dentist, for use
in study models, orthodontic appliances, whitening trays, mouth
guards or fabrication of temporary crowns. Such procedures shall be
performed under either direct or indirect supervision, except as
specifically provided in this subdivision, and the dentist providing such
supervision shall assume responsibility for such procedures.
(3) (A) No licensed dentist may delegate dental procedures to a dental
assistant or expanded function dental assistant unless the dental
assistant or expanded function dental assistant provides records
demonstrating successful completion of the Dental Assisting National
Board's infection control examination or an infection control
competency assessment administered by a dental education program in
the state that is accredited by the American Dental Association's
Public Act No. 26-13 67 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Commission on Dental Accreditation, except as provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection, (B) a dental assistant may receive not more than
fifteen months of on-the-job training by a licensed dentist for purposes
of preparing the dental assistant for the infection control examination or
infection control competency assessment, and (C) any licensed dentist
who delegates dental procedures to a dental assistant shall retain and
make such records available for inspection upon request of the
Department of Public Health.
(4) On and after January 1, 2018, upon successful completion of the
Dental Assisting National Board's infection control examination or an
infection control competency assessment administered by a dental
education program in the state that is accredited by the American Dental
Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation, each dental
assistant or expanded function dental assistant shall complete not less
than one hour of training or education in infection control in a dental
setting every two years, including, but not limited to, courses, including
online courses, offered or approved by a dental school or another
institution of higher education that is accredited or recognized by the
Commission on Dental Accreditation, a regional accrediting
organization, the American Dental Association or a state, district or local
dental association or society affiliated with the American Dental
Association or the American Dental Assistants Association.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, under no
circumstances may a dental assistant or expanded function dental
assistant engage in: (1) Diagnosis for dental procedures or dental
treatment; (2) the cutting or removal of any hard or soft tissue or
suturing; (3) the prescribing of drugs or medications that require the
written or oral order of a licensed dentist or physician; (4) the
administration of local, parenteral, inhalation or general anesthetic
agents in connection with any dental operative procedure; (5) the taking
of any final impression of the teeth or jaws or the relationship of the
Public Act No. 26-13 68 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
teeth or jaws for the purpose of fabricating any appliance or prosthesis;
or (6) the practice of dental hygiene as defined in section 20-126l.
(e) Each licensed dentist employing or otherwise engaging the
services of an expanded function dental assistant shall: (1) Prior to hiring
or otherwise engaging the services of the expanded function dental
assistant, verify that the expanded function dental assistant meets the
requirements described in subdivision (4) of subsection (a) and
subdivisions (1) and (3) of subsection (b) of this section; (2) maintain
documentation verifying that the expanded function dental assistant
meets such requirements on the premises where the expanded function
dental assistant provides services; (3) make such documentation
available to the Department of Public Health upon request; and (4)
provide direct or indirect supervision to not more than two expanded
function dental assistants who are providing services at one time or, if
the dentist's practice is limited to orthodontics, provide direct or indirect
supervision to not more than four expanded function dental assistants
who are providing services at one time.
(f) The Commissioner of Public Health, in consultation with the State
Dental Commission, established pursuant to section 20-103a, may adopt
regulations in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 to
implement the provisions of this section. Such regulations, if adopted,
shall include, but need not be limited to, identification of the: (1) Specific
types of procedures that may be performed by a dental assistant and an
expanded function dental assistant, consistent with the provisions of
this section; (2) appropriate number of didactic, preclinical and clinical
hours or number of procedures to be evaluated for clinical competency
for each skill employed by an expanded function dental assistant; and
(3) the level of supervision, that may include direct or indirect
supervision, that is required for each procedure to be performed by an
expanded function dental assistant.
Sec. 34. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section,
Public Act No. 26-13 69 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
"cosmetic injection" means a nonsurgical procedure involving the
injection of a substance, including, but not limited to, botulinum toxin
or dermal filler, to alter or enhance a person's physical appearance.
(b) A dentist licensed pursuant to chapter 379 of the general statutes
who (1) has successfully completed an in-person hands-on training in
the administration of cosmetic injections administered by a continuing
education provider or program approved by the Commissioner of
Public Health or accredited by a national professional accrediting body,
and (2) maintains professional liability insurance that covers cosmetic
injection procedures, may administer a cosmetic injection to a patient's
face.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a dentist to
administer injections into the tear trough, infraorbital hollow, eyelids,
medial canthal region or other orbit-adjacent soft tissue for the purpose
of periocular volumization or under-eye hollow correction, or into the
forehead, glabella or eyebrows for the purpose of improved cosmesis.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a dentist from
administering (1) a neuromodulator to the lateral canthal region,
including for the treatment of lateral canthal rhytids; (2) an injection for
the management of orofacial pain, temporomandibular disorders or
other oromandibular conditions; or (3) dermal filler to the malar,
zygomatic or midface region when the primary intended treatment site
is the cheek or midface and the injection site remains inferior to the
infraorbital rim.
(d) A dentist shall not delegate the administration of cosmetic
injections to any dental hygienist, dental assistant or other auxiliary
personnel.
(e) The Commissioner of Public Health may adopt regulations, in
accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, minimum
Public Act No. 26-13 70 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
training standards, approved training courses and patient safety
requirements.
Sec. 35. Subsection (a) of section 20-123 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) No person shall engage in the practice of dentistry unless he or
she is licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The practice of
dentistry or dental medicine is defined as the diagnosis, evaluation,
prevention or treatment by surgical or other means, of an injury,
deformity, disease or condition of the oral cavity or its contents, or the
jaws or the associated structures of the jaws. The practice of dentistry
does not include: (1) The treatment of dermatologic diseases or
disorders of the skin or face; (2) the performance of microvascular free
tissue transfer; (3) the treatment of diseases or disorders of the eye; (4)
ocular procedures; (5) the performance of cosmetic surgery or other
cosmetic procedures other than (A) those related to the oral cavity, its
contents, or the jaws, or (B) the administration of a cosmetic injection
pursuant to section 34 of this act; or (6) nasal or sinus surgery, other than
that related to the oral cavity, its contents or the jaws.
Sec. 36. Subsection (b) of section 20-126c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a licensee applying
for license renewal shall earn a minimum of twenty-five contact hours
of continuing education within the preceding twenty-four-month
period. Such continuing education shall (1) be in an area of the licensee's
practice; (2) reflect the professional needs of the licensee in order to meet
the health care needs of the public; and (3) include not less than one
contact hour of training or education in (A) any three of the [ten] twelve
mandatory topics for continuing education activities prescribed by the
Public Act No. 26-13 71 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
commissioner pursuant to this subdivision, (B) [for registration periods
beginning on and after October 1, 2016,] infection control in a dental
setting, and (C) prescribing controlled substances and pain
management. [For registration periods beginning on and after October
1, 2011, the] The Commissioner of Public Health, in consultation with
the Dental Commission, shall on or before October 1, 2010, and
biennially thereafter until October 1, 2026, issue a list that includes ten
mandatory topics for continuing education activities that will be
required for the following two-year registration period. For registration
periods beginning on and after October 1, 2026, the commissioner, in
consultation with said commission, shall on or before October 1, 2026,
and biennially thereafter, issue a list that includes twelve mandatory
topics, including, but not limited to, the provision of dental care to
persons with an intellectual or developmental disability and identifying
victims of human trafficking, that will be required for the following two-
year registration period. Qualifying continuing education activities
include, but are not limited to, courses, including on-line courses,
offered or approved by the American Dental Association or state,
district or local dental associations and societies affiliated with the
American Dental Association; national, state, district or local dental
specialty organizations or the American Academy of General Dentistry;
a hospital or other health care institution; dental schools and other
schools of higher education accredited or recognized by the Council on
Dental Accreditation or a regional accrediting organization; agencies or
businesses whose programs are accredited or recognized by the Council
on Dental Accreditation; local, state or national medical associations; a
state or local health department; or the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education. Eight hours of volunteer dental practice
at a public health facility, as defined in section 20-126l, or a temporary
dental clinic may be substituted for one contact hour of continuing
education, up to a maximum of ten contact hours in one twenty-four-
month period.
Public Act No. 26-13 72 of 73

Substitute House Bill No. 5514
Sec. 37. Sections 17a-227d and 17a-476a of the general statutes are
repealed. (Effective October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 14, 2026
Public Act No. 26-13 73 of 73